Hawaii statutes.
[§636C-5] Stay. (a) If the judgment
debtor shows the court that an appeal from the foreign judgment is pending or
will be taken, or that a stay of execution has been granted, the court shall
stay enforcement of the foreign judgment until the appeal is concluded, the
time for appeal expires, or the stay of execution expires or is vacated, upon
proof that the judgment debtor has furnished the security for the satisfaction
of the judgment required by the state in which it was rendered.

(b) If the judgment debtor shows the court any
ground upon which enforcement of a judgment of any court of this State would be
stayed, the court shall stay enforcement of the foreign judgment for an
appropriate period, upon requiring the same security for satisfaction of the
judgment which is required in this State. [L 1983, c 31, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next